North Carolina, session 2025, HB903.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

INCREASE TROOPERS IN MECKLENBURG COUNTY
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Highway
Patrol the sum of nine hundred ninety-nine thousand four hundred dollars ($999,400) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and one million eighty-eight thousand five hundred
ninety-two dollars ($1,088,592) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used
to fund 12 full-time State Trooper positions.
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 20-192 and any rules and regulations created
pursuant to that statute, the State Trooper positions funded in this act shall result in an increase
of at least 12 State Troopers assigned to State Highway Patrol District H5 of Troop H.
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

INCREASE MAGISTRATES IN MECKLENBURG COUNTY
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 7A-133(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Each county shall have the numbers of magistrates and additional seats of district
court, as set forth in the following table:
Magistrates Additional
County Min. Seats of Court
…
Mecklenburg 38.543.5
…."
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of four hundred two thousand seventy dollars ($402,070) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and fifteen thousand one hundred forty dollars
*H903-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($15,140) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to hire five additional
magistrates to serve in Mecklenburg County pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

INCREASE OF FINES FOR FAILURE TO STOP FOR A SCHOOL BUS AND
EXPANSION OF WHAT CONSTITUTES PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE IN THOSE
CASES
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 20-217 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-217. Motor vehicles to stop for properly marked and designated school buses in
certain instances; evidence of identity of driver.
…
(e) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, any person violating this section
shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and shall pay a minimum fine of five hundred dollars
($500.00). one thousand dollars ($1,000). A person who violates subsection (a) of this section
shall not receive a prayer for judgment continued under any circumstances.
…
(g) Any person who willfully violates subsection (a) of this section and strikes any person
shall be guilty of a Class I felony and shall pay a minimum fine of one thousand two hundred
fifty dollars ($1,250). four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500). Any person who willfully
violates subsection (a) of this section and strikes any person, resulting in the death of that person,
shall be guilty of a Class H felony and shall pay a minimum fine of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500).seven thousand dollars ($7,000).
…
(i) Whenever evidence is presented in any court or administrative hearing of the fact that
a vehicle was operated in violation of this section, it shall be prima facie evidence that the vehicle
was operated by the person in whose name the vehicle was registered at the time of the violation
according to the Division's records. If the vehicle is rented, then proof of that rental shall be prima
facie evidence that the vehicle was operated by the renter of the vehicle at the time of the
violation."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PROVISIONS REGARDING THE RECORDING, STORAGE, AND DISCLOSURE OF
VIDEO FROM DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION HIGHWAY CAMERAS
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 132-1.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(i) Highway camera video records stored by the Department of Transportation may not
be disclosed except as provided in G.S. 132-1.7B."
SECTION 4.(b) Chapter 132 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 132-1.7B. Highway camera video records.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Disclose or disclosure. – To make a recording available for viewing or
listening to by the person requesting disclosure, at a time and location chosen
by the custodial law enforcement agency. This term does not include the
release of a recording.
(2) Highway camera. – A Department of Transportation video or digital camera,
located on highway right-of-way, for the purpose of monitoring vehicle
traffic.
(3) Personal representative. – A parent, court-appointed guardian, spouse, or
attorney of a person whose image or voice is in the recording. If a person
whose image or voice is in the recording is deceased, the term also means the
Page 2 House Bill 903-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
personal representative of the estate of the deceased person; the deceased
person's surviving spouse, parent, or adult child; the deceased person's
attorney; or the parent or guardian of a surviving minor child of the deceased.
(4) Recording. – A visual, or visual and audio, recording captured by a highway
camera.
(5) Release. – To provide a copy of a recording.
(b) Highway cameras shall record and store incidents upon the request of law
enforcement agencies to assist the following types of incident investigations along the interstates
and highways:
(1) Vehicle chases.
(2) Hit and run crashes.
(3) Road rage altercations.
(4) Street races.
(5) Street takeovers.
(6) Any other incident investigations of which law enforcement agencies feel the
assistance of this technology would support and expedite.
(c) Public Record Classification. – Recordings under this section are not public records,
as defined by G.S. 132-1.
(d) Disclosure; General. – Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section,
recordings shall be disclosed only as provided by this section. A person requesting disclosure of
a recording must make a written request to the Department of Transportation. The request shall
include the name of the person making the request, date and approximate time of the activity
captured in the recording, or otherwise identify the activity with reasonable particularity
sufficient to identify the recording to which the request refers. The Department may only disclose
a recording to the following:
(1) A person whose image or voice is in the recording.
(2) A personal representative of an adult person whose image or voice is in the
recording, if the adult person has consented to the disclosure.
(3) A personal representative of a minor or of an adult person under lawful
guardianship whose image or voice is in the recording.
(4) A personal representative of a deceased person whose image or voice is in the
recording.
(5) A personal representative of an adult person who is incapacitated and unable
to provide consent to disclosure.
When disclosing the recording, the Department shall disclose only those portions of the
recording that are relevant to the person's request. A person who receives disclosure pursuant to
this subsection shall not record or copy the recording.
(e) Disclosure; Factors for Consideration. – Upon receipt of the written request for
disclosure under subsection (d) of this section, as promptly as possible, the Department must
either disclose the portion of the recording relevant to the person's request or notify the requestor
of the decision not to disclose the recording to the requestor. The Department may consider any
of the following factors in determining if a recording is disclosed:
(1) If the person requesting disclosure of the recording is a person authorized to
receive disclosure pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(2) If the recording contains information that is otherwise confidential or exempt
from disclosure or release under State or federal law.
(3) If disclosure would reveal information regarding a person that is of a highly
sensitive personal nature.
(4) If disclosure may harm the reputation or jeopardize the safety of a person.
(5) If disclosure would create a serious threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly
administration of justice.
House Bill 903-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) If confidentiality is necessary to protect either an active or inactive internal or
criminal investigation or potential internal or criminal investigation.
(f) Appeal of Disclosure Denial. – If the Department denies disclosure pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section, or has failed to provide disclosure more than three business days
after the request for disclosure, the person seeking disclosure may apply to the superior court in
any county where any portion of the recording was made for a review of the denial of disclosure.
The court may conduct an in-camera review of the recording. The court may order the disclosure
of the recording only if the court finds that the Department abused its discretion in denying the
request for disclosure. The court may only order disclosure of those portions of the recording that
are relevant to the person's request. A person who receives disclosure pursuant to this subsection
shall not record or copy the recording. An order issued pursuant to this subsection may not order
the release of the recording.
In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection, the following persons shall be notified and
those persons, or their designated representative, shall be given an opportunity to be heard at any
proceeding: (i) the head of the Department, (ii) any law enforcement agency personnel whose
image or voice is in the recording and the head of that person's employing law enforcement
agency, and (iii) the district attorney. Actions brought pursuant to this subsection shall be set
down for hearing as soon as practicable, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be
accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.
(g) Release of Recordings; General; Court Order Required. – Except as provided under
subsection (b) of this section, recordings shall only be released pursuant to court order. Any
person requesting release of a recording may file an action in the superior court in any county
where any portion of the recording was made for an order releasing the recording. The request
for release must state the date and approximate time of the activity captured in the recording or
otherwise identify the activity with reasonable particularity sufficient to identify the recording to
which the action refers. The court may conduct an in-camera review of the recording. In
determining whether to order the release of all or a portion of the recording, in addition to any
other standards the court deems relevant, the court shall consider the applicability of all of the
following standards:
(1) Release is necessary to advance a compelling public interest.
(2) The recording contains information that is otherwise confidential or exempt
from disclosure or release under State or federal law.
(3) The person requesting release is seeking to obtain evidence to determine legal
issues in a current or potential court proceeding.
(4) Release would reveal information regarding a person that is of a highly
sensitive personal nature.
(5) Release may harm the reputation or jeopardize the safety of a person.
(6) Release would create a serious threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly
administration of justice.
(7) Confidentiality is necessary to protect either an active or inactive internal or
criminal investigation or potential internal or criminal investigation.
(8) There is good cause shown to release all portions of a recording.
The court shall release only those portions of the recording that are relevant to the person's
request and may place any conditions or restrictions on the release of the recording that the court,
in its discretion, deems appropriate.
In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection, the following persons shall be notified and
those persons, or their designated representative, shall be given an opportunity to be heard at any
proceeding: (i) the head of the Department, (ii) any law enforcement agency personnel whose
image or voice is in the recording and the head of that person's employing law enforcement
agency, and (iii) the district attorney. Actions brought pursuant to this subsection shall be set
Page 4 House Bill 903-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
down for hearing as soon as practicable, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be
accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.
(h) Release of Recordings; Law Enforcement Purposes. – Notwithstanding any provision
of this section to the contrary, the Department shall disclose or release a recording to a district
attorney (i) for review of potential criminal charges, (ii) in order to comply with discovery
requirements in a criminal prosecution, (iii) for use in criminal proceedings in district court, or
(iv) for any other law enforcement purpose and may disclose or release a recording for suspect
identification or apprehension or to locate a missing or abducted person.
(i) Retention of Recordings. – The Department shall not be required to retain any
recording subject to the provisions of this section for more than 30 days, unless a court of
competent jurisdiction orders otherwise.
(j) No civil liability shall arise from compliance with the provisions of this section,
provided that the acts or omissions are made in good faith and do not constitute gross negligence,
willful or wanton misconduct, or intentional wrongdoing.
(k) Fee for Copies. – The Department may charge a fee to offset the cost incurred by it
to make a copy of a recording for release. The fee shall not exceed the actual cost of making the
copy.
(l) Attorneys' Fees. – The court may not award attorneys' fees to any party in any action
brought pursuant to this section.
(m) Use of Recordings. – Recordings subject to this section may not be used for fines or
private investigation.
(n) Elected Official. – No elected official may review recordings subject to this section,
unless they meet the criteria in subsection (d) of this section. This subsection does not apply to a
county sheriff or district attorney if review of the recordings is within the scope of a criminal
investigation."
SECTION 4.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

FUND THE 24-HOUR OPERATION OF THE NORTH CAROLINA DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION METROLINA TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT CENTER
IN CHARLOTTE
SECTION 5.(a) There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year for the purpose of expanding the operational hours of the IMap and North Carolina
Department of Transportation Metrolina Transportation Management Center in Charlotte, North
Carolina, to 24 hours a day, every day of the year.
SECTION 5.(b) Of the funds appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sums of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000)
in recurring funds and twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in nonrecurring funds are allocated
to be used by the Department for the purpose of expanding the operational hours of the IMap and
North Carolina Department of Transportation Metrolina Transportation Management Center in
Charlotte, North Carolina, to 24 hours a day, every day of the year.
SECTION 5.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 903-First Edition Page 5